Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska72-220
School lands; acquisition for cemetery purposes.

Any city, village, cemetery association or corporation for the control of cemeteries, may acquire, for cemetery and burial purposes, any of the educational land, not exceeding in the aggregate forty acres, and may purchase additional adjoining tracts not exceeding ten acres each, if and when it becomes necessary to enlarge such cemetery.

Laws 1899, c. 69, § 11, p. 304;

Laws 1905, c. 144, § 1, p. 582;

Laws 1907, c. 134, § 1, p. 437;

Laws 1913, c. 40, § 1, p. 135;

R.S.1913, § 5855;

Laws 1915, c. 103, § 1, p. 247;

Laws 1921, c. 80, § 2, p. 290;

C.S.1922, § 5191;

Laws 1923, c. 61, § 1, p. 185;

Laws 1925, c. 135, § 1, p. 354;

Laws 1929, c. 188, § 1, p. 652;

C.S.1929, § 72-211;

Laws 1931, c. 118, § 1, p. 345;

Laws 1935, c. 164, § 1, p. 611;

Laws 1941, c. 145, § 1, p. 576;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 72-211;

Laws 1943, c. 160, § 1, p. 574;

R.S.1943, § 72-220.